apertium-cy-en.cy.dix
    <pardef n="sibr/wd__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wd</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yded</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydwn</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydwch</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydent</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yder</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydwn</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydit</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydai</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydem</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydech</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydent</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydid</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydais</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydaist</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydodd</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydasom</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydasoch</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydasant</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydwyd</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydaswn</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydasit</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydasai</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydasem</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydasech</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydasent</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydasid</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydaf</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydi</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydwn</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydwch</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydant</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydir</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydwyf</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydych</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydo</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydom</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydoch</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydont</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yder</l>
          <r>wd<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="sibrwd"><i>sibr</i><par n="sibr/wd__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="siffrwd"><i>siffr</i><par n="sibr/wd__vblex"/></e>
